Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 19 Human Rights Commission [Repealed]

19.010.
“Discrimination” defined. [Repealed.]

19.020.
Establishment of commission — Membership — Terms. [Renumbered as KRS 344.150.]

19.030.
Commission’s function. [Renumbered as KRS 344.170.]

19.040.
Commission’s powers and duties. [Renumbered as KRS 344.180.]

19.050.
Construction of chapter. [Repealed.]